nl: Compatibel apparaat: Digitale camera; Keyboard; Muis; Powerbank; Smartphone; Smartwatch; Tablet; Draadloos oordopje; Andere
pt-BR: Dispositivo compatível: Câmera digital; Teclado; Camundongo; Banco de potência; Smartphone; Smartwatch; Tablet; Fone de ouvido sem fio; Outro
en: Compatible device: Digital camera; Keyboard; Mouse; Power bank; Smartphone; Smartwatch; Tablet; Wireless earbud; Other
lt-LT: Suderinamas įrenginys: Skaitmeninis fotoaparatas; Klaviatūra; Pelė; Išorinio maitinimo akumuliatorius; Išmanusis telefonas; Išmanusis laikrodis; Planšetinis kompiuteris; Belaidė ausinė; Kita
ja: 対応デバイス: デジタルカメラ; キーボード; ネズミ; パワーバンク; スマートフォン; スマートウォッチ; タブレット; ワイヤレスイヤホン; その他
es: Dispositivo compatible: Cámara digital; Teclado; Ratón; Banco de potencia; Teléfono inteligente; Reloj inteligente; Tableta; Auricular inalámbrico; Otros
sl-SI: Združljiva naprava: Digitalni fotoaparat; Tipkovnica; Miška; Napajalna banka; Pametni telefon; Pametna ura; Tablični računalnik; Brezžična slušalka; Drugo
tr: Uyumlu Cihaz: Dijital kameralar; Klavye; Fare; Power bank; Akıllı telefon; Akıllı saat; Tablet; Kablosuz kulaklık; Diğer
el: Συμβατή συσκευή: Ψηφιακή κάμερα; Αρμόνιο; Ποντίκι; Τροφοδοτικό ισχύος (Power bank); Smartphone; Smartwatch; Τάμπλετ; Ασύρματο ακουστικό; Άλλο
pt-PT: Dispositivo compatível: Câmara digital; Teclado; Rato; Power bank; Smartphone; Smartwatch; Tablet; Auricular sem fios; Outro
hr-HR: Kompatibilni uređaj: Digitalni fotoaparat; Tipkovnica; Miš; Prijenosni punjač; Pametni telefon; Pametni sat; Tablet; Bežična slušalica; Ostalo
vi: Thiết bị tương thích: Máy ảnh kĩ thuật số; Đàn phím; Chuột nhắt; Sạc dự phòng; Điện thoại thông minh; Đồng hồ thông minh; Máy tính bảng; Tai nghe không dây; Khác
zh-TW: 相容裝置: 數位相機; 鍵盤樂器; 鼠; 行動電源; 智慧型手機; 智慧手錶; 平板電腦; 無線耳機; 其他
ko: 호환 가능한 장치: 디지털 카메라; 키보드; 마우스; 파워뱅크; 스마트폰; 스마트 워치; 정제; 무선 이어버드; 기타
fi: Yhteensopiva laite: Digitaalikamera; Kosketinsoitin; Hiiri; Virtapankki; Älypuhelin; Älykello; Tabletti; Langaton nappikuuloke; Muu
pl: Zgodne urządzenie: Cyfrowy aparat fotograficzny; Klawiatura; Mysz; Ładowarka akumulatorów; Smartfon; Smartwatch; Tablet; Słuchawka douszna bezprzewodowa; Inne
bg-BG: Съвместимо устройство: Цифрова камера; Клавиатура; Мишка; Външно зарядно устройство; Смартфон; Смарт часовник; Таблет; Безжични слушалки; Други
zh-CN: 适用设备: 数码相机; 键盘; 老鼠; 充电宝; 智能手机; 智能手表; 平板电脑; 无线耳塞; 其他
fr: Appareil compatible: Appareils photo numériques; Clavier; Souris; Banque d’alimentation; Smartphone; Smartwatch; Tablette; Écouteur sans fil; Autre
ro-RO: Dispozitiv compatibil: Aparat foto digital; Tastatură; Mouse; Baterie externă; Smartphone; Ceas inteligent; Tabletă; Căști wireless; Altele
sv: Kompatibel enhet: Digitalkamera; Keyboard; Mus; Powerbank; Smartphone; Smartwatch; Surfplatta; Trådlös öronsnäcka; Övrigt
de: Kompatibles Gerät: Digitalkamera; Keyboard; Maus; Powerbank; Smartphone; Smartwatch; Tablet; Kabelloser Ohrhörer; Sonstiges
cs: Kompatibilní zařízení: Digitální fotoaparát; Klávesnice; Myš; Powerbanka; Smartphone; Chytré hodinky; Tablet; Bezdrátová sluchátka; Jiné
da: Kompatibel enhed: Digitalkamera; Keyboard; Mus; Powerbank; Smartphone; Smartwatch; Tablet; Trådløs øretelefon; Andet
ru: Совместимые устройства: Цифровая камера; Клавиатура; Мышь; Внешний аккумулятор; Смартфон; Смарт-часы; Планшет; Беспроводные наушники; Другое
it: Dispositivo compatibile: Telecamera digitale; Tastiera; Mouse; Power bank; Smartphone; Smartwatch; Tablet; Auricolare senza fili; Altro
sk-SK: Kompatibilné zariadenie: Digitálny fotoaparát; Klávesnica; Myš; Power banka; Smartfón; Inteligentné hodinky; Tablet; Bezdrôtové slúchadlo; Iné
th: อุปกรณ์ที่รองรับ: กล้องดิจิทัล; คีย์บอร์ด; หนูตัวเล็ก; พาวเวอร์แบงค์; สมาร์ทโฟน; สมาร์ทวอทช์; แท็บเล็ต; หูฟังไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
nb: Kompatibel enhet: Digitalkamera; Tastatur; Mus; Powerbank; Smarttelefon; Smartklokke; Nettbrett; Trådløs øreplugg; Annet
hu: Kompatibilis eszköz: Digitális fényképezőgép; Keyboard; Egér; Power bank; Okostelefon; Okosóra; Táblagép; Vezeték nélküli fülhallgató; Egyéb